California, session 20252026, AB2367.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 19851.2 is added to the Government Code, to read:19851.2. (a) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the State Department of Developmental Services, the Department of Veterans Affairs, and the State Department of State Hospitals shall provide, on a quarterly basis, the following information, by facility, of their state-run health facilities:(1) Vacancy data that includes the following information: classification title, classification code, full-time equivalent, total positions filled, and total vacant positions.(2) Overtime data that includes the following information: a monthly breakdown by classification to include voluntary and mandatory overtime, including a.m., p.m., and nocturnal shift hours, and total hours worked.(3) All registry contract data that includes the following information: bill rate and pay rate by classification, monthly total hours worked, and annual amount paid.(4) The number of shifts during which, and the number of staff by which, the facility fell short of its required shift staffing minimums, and an explanation for why it missed those minimums.(b) The information shall be provided to the relevant employee representatives and shall be made available to the public on a publicly accessible website.SECTION 1.Section 19851 of the Government Code is amended to read:19851.(a)It is the policy of the state, except during the operation of subdivision (c), that the workweek of a state employee shall be 40 hours, and the workday of those employees eight hours, except that workweeks and workdays of a different number of hours may be established in order to meet the varying needs of the different state agencies. It is the policy of the state to avoid the necessity for overtime work whenever possible. This policy does not restrict the extension of regular working-hour schedules on an overtime basis in those activities and agencies where it is necessary to carry on the state business properly during a manpower shortage.(b)If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Section 3517.5, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if the provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.(c)(1)Notwithstanding any other law, for the period from July 1, 2012, to June 30, 2013, inclusive, a state employee shall participate in the Personal Leave Program 2012 (PLP 2012 Program), either as required by an applicable memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Section 3517.5 or by the direction of the department for excluded employees. Under the PLP 2012 Program, each employee shall receive a reduction in pay not greater than 5 percent. In exchange for this reduction in pay, each employee shall receive eight hours of PLP 2012 Program leave credits on the first day of each monthly pay period. This subdivision shall not apply to retired annuitants or to employees of entities listed in Section 3.90 of the Budget Act of 2012.(2)Notwithstanding any other law, for the period from July 1, 2020, to June 30, 2021, inclusive, a state employee shall participate in the Personal Leave Program 2020 (PLP 2020 Program), either as required by an applicable memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Section 3517.5 or by the direction of the department for excluded employees. Under the PLP 2020 Program, each employee shall receive a reduction in pay not greater than 10 percent. In exchange for this reduction in pay, each employee shall receive up to 16 hours of PLP 2020 Program leave credits on the first day of each monthly pay period. This subdivision shall not apply to retired annuitants or to employees of entities listed in Section 3.90 of the Budget Act of 2020.(3)Notwithstanding any other law, for the period from July 1, 2025, to June 30, 2027, inclusive, a state employee in Bargaining Unit 6 shall participate in the Personal Leave Program 2025 (PLP 2025), as required by an applicable memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Section 3517.5 or by the direction of the department for excluded employees. Under PLP 2025, each employee in Bargaining Unit 6 shall receive a reduction in pay not greater than 3 percent. In exchange for this reduction in pay, on the first day of each monthly pay period, each employee shall receive up to five hours of PLP 2025 leave credits, except that an employee with the class title Fire Captain (Class Code 9001) and Ranges L or M (192-hour schedule) or Ranges N or P (216-hour schedule) shall receive up to seven hours of PLP 2025 leave credits. This subdivision shall not apply to employees of entities listed in Section 3.90 of the Budget Act of 2025.(4)Notwithstanding any other law, for the period from July 1, 2025, to June 30, 2027, inclusive, a state employee in Bargaining Unit 9 or Bargaining Unit 12 shall participate in the Personal Leave Program 2025 (PLP 2025), as required by an applicable memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Section 3517.5. Under PLP 2025, each employee in Bargaining Unit 9 or 12 shall receive a reduction in pay not greater than 3 percent. In exchange for this reduction in pay, on the first day of each monthly pay period, each employee shall receive up to five hours of PLP 2025 leave credits. This subdivision shall not apply to employees of entities listed in Section 3.90 of the Budget Act of 2025.(5)Notwithstanding any other law, for the period from July 1, 2025, to June 30, 2027, inclusive, a state employee in State Bargaining Units 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7, 11, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 19, 20, and 21 shall participate in the Personal Leave Program 2025 (PLP 2025), either as required by an applicable memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Section 3517.5 or by the direction of the department for excluded employees. Under PLP 2025, each employee in State Bargaining Units 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7, 11, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 19, 20, and 21 shall receive a reduction in pay not greater than the amount listed in an applicable memorandum of understanding or as directed by the department for excluded employees. In exchange for this reduction in pay, each employee shall receive PLP 2025 leave credits on the first day of each monthly pay period, at the rate outlined in the applicable memorandum of understanding or as directed by the department for excluded employees. This subdivision shall not apply to employees of entities listed in Section 3.90 of the Budget Act of 2025.(6)Notwithstanding any other law, beginning on the first day of the pay period following ratification and ending on June 30, 2027, inclusive, a state employee in State Bargaining Units 8, 10, and 18 shall participate in the Personal Leave Program 2025 (PLP 2025), either as required by an applicable memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Section 3517.5 or by the direction of the department for excluded employees. Under PLP 2025, each employee in State Bargaining Units 8, 10, and 18 shall receive a reduction in pay not greater than the amount listed in an applicable memorandum of understanding or as directed by the department for excluded employees. In exchange for this reduction in pay, each employee shall receive PLP 2025 leave credits on the first day of each monthly pay period, at the rate outlined in the applicable memorandum of understanding or as directed by the department for excluded employees. This subdivision shall not apply to employees of entities listed in Section 3.90 of the Budget Act of 2025.